District of Columbia statutes.
33-520

Repealed

Effect of retirement, death, or insanity of a general partner.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 659, Pub. L. 87-716, § 20
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856
1981 Ed., § 41-220.
1973 Ed., § 41-420.